Hawaii statutes.
§663J-8 Stay of action. On motion by a
governmental agency involved in an investigation or prosecution for promoting
prostitution or sex trafficking, an action brought under this chapter shall be
stayed until the completion of the criminal investigation or prosecution that
gave rise to the motion for a stay of the action. [L 1999, c 203, pt of §2; am
L 2016, c 206, §9]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next